Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 9 Nursery Stock

Power to regulate nursery stock. —

State may establish and enforce regulations governing inspection and sale of nursery stock, eradication of fruit pests and prohibiting sales without license. Welch v. Nelson, 23 Wyo. 409, 152 P. 788,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 16, 35, 52.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 65, 68.

§ 11-9-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

11-9-101

through

11-9-109

:

“Nursery” means any ground, place or establishment where nursery stock is grown, offered for sale, sold, distributed or is offered as part of a landscape service;

“Nursery stock” means:

All field-grown, greenhouse-grown or collected wild stock of woody plants such as fruit, forest, windbreak, shade and ornamental trees, shrubs or vines for fruit production, ornamental or protective plantings and herbaceous perennials used as ornamentals;

All plants, rooted cuttings and plants with roots attached grown from bulbs, corms, tubers, rhizomes or other vegetative parts, whether produced out-of-doors or under glass and whether grown in open ground or in benches, boxes, pots or other containers;

All bulbs, corms, pips, rhizomes, tubers, roots, cuttings, scions, grafts or other vegetative parts of plants; and

All ground cover, including sod, plugs and vegetative mulches and compost.

“Nursery stock” shall not include prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds;

“Nursery stock dealers” means any person who obtains nursery stock to be offered for sale or distribution;

“Nursery stock salesman” means any person selling, distributing or soliciting orders for delivery of nursery stock directly to the ultimate consumer from a supply on hand at a location other than a nursery stock dealer’s place of business;

“Injurious insect” means any animal of the phylum Arthropoda known to be injurious to agricultural or horticultural plants;

“Other pest” means any animal of the phyla Mollusca or Nematoda or parasitic plant, plant parasite or other vector known to be injurious to agricultural or horticultural plants;

“Plant disease” means any fungi, bacteria, or virus injurious to plants and plant products;

“Plant inspection or health certificate” means a legal document issued by the department or the plant regulatory agency of another state declaring that the nursery stock being sold or distributed is apparently free of injurious insects, plant diseases, other pests and prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds;

“Vector” means an insect, plant or other organism that transmits an insect, fungus, virus, bacterium or other infection;

“Designated noxious weed” means as defined in W.S. 11-5-102(a)(xi);

“Substantially free” means any injurious insect, other pest or plant disease is not locatable in groups or not affecting more than one percent (1%) of the nursery stock.

These definitions do not include cut Christmas trees, cut flowers, seeds, seed potatoes or plant parts grown or offered for consumption as human food or as feed for animals.

Age, when stated on any advertisement, label or sign in connection with the sale or offering for sale or distribution of nursery stock, shall be stated in years from time at which such nursery stock was propagated and each shall indicate the completion in autumn of one (1) seasonal growth period.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.1; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 106, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “11-9-109” for “11-9-108” in the introductory language, inserted (ii)(D), (iii), (vii), (ix) through (xii) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly, substituted “or is offered as part of a landscape service” for “or distributed” in (i),
deleted “berry” preceding “plants” in (ii)(B), substituted “or horticultural” for “or ornamental” in present (vi), substituted “or virus” for “nematode, virus or plant parasite” in present (viii); and made stylistic and related changes.

§ 11-9-102.
License
requirements and fees for dealers and salesmen; disposition of fees.

No person shall engage in the business of selling, offering for sale or distributing nursery stock within Wyoming without first obtaining a license from the state department of agriculture. The fee for a license shall be the fee authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

.

Upon application for a resident nursery stock dealer license and payment of the required fee, the director, or an authorized inspector shall inspect the premises and stock of the applicant and shall issue the license if the inspection shows the premises and stock to be substantially free or apparently free from injurious insects, plant diseases or other pests and free of prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds.

If the inspection reveals the premises or stock not to be substantially free or apparently free of injurious insects, plant diseases, other pests or prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds, the nursery stock shall be removed or quarantined from sale and a written plan of action to remedy the condition by treatment, control actions or destruction shall be presented to the inspector within one (1) working day. The nursery shall be inspected again within a time agreed upon by the director, or his authorized agent, and the dealer and noted in writing on the plan, but no later than fifteen (15) days after the previous inspection. Upon subsequent inspection the nursery stock shall be substantially free or apparently free from the injurious insects, plant diseases and other pests and free from prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds in order to be released for sale. Failure to comply with this subsection shall subject the dealer to the penalties provided in W.S.

11-9-108

or

11-9-109

.

No person shall act as a nursery stock salesman without first securing a license from the state department of agriculture. The fee for a license shall be the fee authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

.

No nonresident shall sell, take orders to sell, offer for sale or distribute nursery stock which has been grown outside this state without first securing a license from the department of agriculture. The license fee for each establishment shipping nursery stock into Wyoming shall be the fee authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

. No license shall be granted to a nonresident unless the applicant agrees to furnish with each shipment of nursery stock an affidavit stating that the nursery stock to be sold, offered for sale or transported into Wyoming has been inspected by the proper state, district or county officials of the state of origin and found free from injurious insects, plant diseases and prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds.

Licenses granted to nursery stock dealers or salesmen expire on March 31 of each year. All license fees collected shall be deposited in the general fund.

Charitable and educational institutions shall be exempt from licensing requirements imposed by this section.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.2; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 135, § 2; ch. 191, § 3; 2007, ch. 106, §§ 2, 4.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “or transporting” preceding “nursery” in (a); in (b), inserted “substantially free or,” substituted “other pests and free of prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds” for
“primary noxious or designated weeds”; inserted (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in present (d), inserted “fee for a,” and deleted “granted if the applicant shows evidence of knowledge of the nursery stock industry and pays” following “licence shall be”; substituted “prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds” for “noxious or designated weeds” in present (e); in present (f), deleted “within or outside of Wyoming” preceding “expire on March 31” and substituted “of each year” for “next following date of issue”; added (g); and made a stylistic change.

§ 11-9-103.
Right
of entry of authorized persons for inspection.

The director, or his
authorized agents, during reasonable business hours, may enter upon
or into any premises, lands, establishments or places in this state
where they suspect that injurious insects, other pests, plant diseases
or prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds occur
for the purpose of inspecting, controlling or exterminating insects
or diseases or otherwise carrying out the provisions of W.S.

11-9-101

through

11-9-109

.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.3; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2007, ch. 106, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “other pests,” inserted “prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated,” deleted “or designated” preceding “weeds”, and substituted “11-9-109” for “11-9-108.”

§ 11-9-104.
Shipping
inspection certificate; health certificate; public carriers not to
accept stock without affidavit.

Any person receiving directly or indirectly any nursery stock which is not accompanied by a valid shipping inspection certificate shall notify the department of the arrival of such stock, the kinds and amounts of the stock, and the name of the consignor, and shall hold the stock until inspected and released by the department.

Public carriers shall not accept for shipment nursery stock that does not bear a proper affidavit showing apparent freedom from injurious insect, plant diseases, other pests and prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds.

Any person shipping, selling or distributing nursery stock from out of state shall furnish with each shipment of nursery stock a plant inspection or health certificate stating that the nursery stock to be sold, offered for sale or distributed into Wyoming has been inspected and issued a plant inspection or health certificate by the state of origin.

Resident nursery stock dealers shall request an inspection of any nursery stock to be shipped out of Wyoming. An annual inspection shall be sufficient for the purposes of this subsection. The department shall issue a plant inspection or health certificate after inspection by the department of the premises and nursery stock.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.4; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 106, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), inserted “injurious,” deleted “pests,” preceding “plant disease,” inserted “other pests,”
inserted “prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated” and deleted “or designated” preceding “weeds”; added (c) and (d); and made related changes.

§ 11-9-105.
Nursery
stock for sale; condition generally.

All nursery stock sold or offered for sale shall be in a sound, healthy condition and shall be stored and displayed under conditions which will maintain its vigor. Nursery stock which is dead or so seriously weakened that it will not grow with normal vigor when given reasonable care shall not be sold or offered for sale.

All nursery stock to be sold, offered for sale or distributed shall be substantially free or apparently free of any injurious insects, plant diseases, other pests or prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated weeds.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.5; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 106, § 2; 2008, ch. 3, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, redesignated the former provisions as (b) and added (a).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), inserted “to be sold, offered for sale or distributed,” deleted “and shall not be sold, offered for sale or distributed” at the end; and made a stylistic change.

§ 11-9-106.
Sale of nursery stock; labels required; identification of stock.

All nursery stock offered for sale, sold, distributed or transported in Wyoming shall be labeled plainly and legibly, either by common or botanical names. When grade-size classifications are declared, they must be in compliance with those established by the department.

Nursery stock on display for sale may be labeled by a suitable sign on a block of stock of the same kind and species. In order to properly identify nursery stock being delivered or transported to any purchaser, at least one (1) label bearing the botanical or common name, or both, shall be attached to each separate species or variety, except when delivered to the purchaser on the premises and sold from a block of stock labeled with a suitable sign.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.6; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-9-107.
Rules
and regulations by director of agriculture; objections.

The director may issue
and enforce rules, regulations and definitions to implement the provisions
of W.S.

11-9-101

through

11-9-109

, subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.7; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2007, ch. 106, § 2.

Cross references. —

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, see § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “11-9-109, subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act” for “11-9-108” and deleted the former last sentence, pertaining to filing objections before final adoption of rules.

§ 11-9-108.
Cease
and desist orders; quarantine; confiscation; destruction or removal
of nursery stock; hearing; final orders; enforcement.

The department is authorized to issue cease and desist orders to any nursery stock dealer, quarantine any place of nursery stock business or order confiscation, destruction or removal from the state, of any nursery stock the department determines poses a serious risk of introducing or spreading injurious insects, plant diseases, other pests or prohibited, restricted, regulated or designated noxious weeds within the state.

All notices and orders required to be served by the department under this article shall be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the nursery stock dealer or may be served as provided by the Wyoming rules of civil procedure. The notice of an order issued by the department under this article shall include:

A statement of the grounds for issuing the order, including a citation of the statute or rule involved;

A statement of the supporting facts;

A statement informing the nursery stock dealer subject to the order of the right to a hearing on the order before the director, right of appeal of any subsequent order in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and that failure to timely request a hearing shall result in the order becoming final; and

A copy of the order.

A request for a hearing on a proposed order issued by the department under this article shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the director no later than seven (7) days after receipt of the notice from the department. The director shall hold the hearing not later than fifteen (15) days after receipt of the request for hearing, unless the nursery stock dealer subject to the proposed order requests an extension of time for good cause shown.

A hearing on a proposed order issued under this article shall be a contested case hearing conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. After the hearing, the director shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law and a final decision either confirming or dismissing the proposed order. The director shall confirm a proposed order only if the director finds by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds exist under this article for issuing the proposed order. Otherwise, the director shall dismiss the proposed order. If the director confirms a proposed order it shall become a final order.

The department shall serve a final order upon the nursery stock dealer who is the subject of the order. The final order shall take effect upon service and shall remain in effect until the department or a court of competent jurisdiction terminates the final order. The nursery stock dealer who is the subject of the final order may appeal the issuance of the final order in accordance with Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

On or after the effective date of a final order under this article, the attorney general, upon request from the department, may apply to the district court of the county in which the nursery is located or the county where the violations of this article occurred, for enforcement of the final order.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 106, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 106, § 3, effective July 1, 2007, renumbered former §

11-9-108

as §

11-9-109

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 106, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 11-9-109.
Penalty
for violation of provisions.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

11-9-101

through

11-9-109

or any rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each offense, and may have any license issued to them under such statutes suspended or revoked. Each day shall constitute a separate violation.

Any person found guilty of violating any provision of W.S.

11-9-101

through

11-9-109

, shall reimburse the state for the cost of any treatments, control actions, quarantine, confiscation, destruction or removal of any nursery stock from the state resulting from the violation. Amounts collected under this subsection shall be paid to the department of agriculture technical services division account.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 56, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-125.8; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 106, § 3.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “11-9-109” for “11-9-108,” substituted “more” for “less,” substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more than one hundred dollars ($100.00),” and added the last sentence; added (b); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 106, § 3, effective July 1, 2007, amended and renumbered former §

11-9-108

as §

11-9-109

, effective July 1, 2007.